Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Chapter 2. Art in State Buildings

§ 41.
Purpose.

The State of Vermont, recognizing the need to enhance the working environment, to improve the character and quality of State buildings in order to create an environment of distinction, enjoyment, and pride for all citizens, and to encourage the donation of works of art to the State for its permanent collection or for exhibition in State buildings or facilities, hereby establishes a program to provide funds for and authorize the installation of permanent works of art at the time of new construction or renovation of State buildings and other facilities.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 67, eff. June 21, 1994;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 42.
Definitions.

Unless the context specifically indicates otherwise, as used in this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

“Addition” means any new construction that increases the height or floor area of an existing building or facility.

“Contracting agency” means the administrative unit of State government responsible for securing the preparation of plans and specifications of a State building or facility for the purpose of negotiating or advertising for bids for the construction of such building or facility.

“Council” means the Vermont Council on the Arts, Inc.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.

“Occupant agency” means that public entity that has or will have principal authority to use or occupy a public building.

“Mixed media” means any combination of two or more types of materials used to create a single work of art in two or three dimensions.

“Project cost” means the budgeted cost of a construction or renovation project, excluding the cost of design and of land acquisition or land improvement.

“State building or facility” means any State building, facility, permanent structure, park, or appurtenant structure thereof, wholly or partially enclosed, owned or leased by State government, the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College, or Vermont State Colleges, that is to be constructed or renovated in part or totally with funds from any appropriation of the General Assembly. The term does not include highways, airport runways, or taxi ways, hangars, railroad tracks, sidings or yards, garages, sheds, warehouses, heating plants, sewers, parking lots and parking garages, bridges, highway garages, correctional facilities, or buildings used for storage or that are of a temporary nature. The term does not include buildings or facilities owned by units of local government, including school districts.

“Project site” means any State building or facility undergoing new construction or renovation with a total project cost of $1,000,000.00 or more that has been approved for consideration by the Commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

“Renovation” means any improvement to an existing building or facility, without increasing the height or floor area of the building or facility. The term does not include repairs or maintenance to an existing building or facility.

“Works of art” means an original creation of visual art in sculpture, paintings, graphic arts, mosaics, photography, crafts, calligraphy, mixed media, or any other creation that the advisory committee deems a visual art.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 43.
Art Acquisition Fund.

An Art Acquisition Fund is created to finance the design, construction and purchase or commissioning of works of art to be included as an integral part of the structure of State buildings and facilities. Such works of art may be attached to the structure or may be detached within or outside the structure.

Amounts in the Art Acquisition Fund at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.

Amounts in the Fund shall be expended upon order of the Council for acquisition or commissioning of works of art and for administration, as provided in this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 44.
Funds transfer for art.

The Commissioner of Buildings and General Services, with the approval of the Secretary of Administration, may transfer up to $50,000.00 in any single fiscal year to the Art Acquisition Fund, from capital funds appropriated for projects which are eligible for the installation of works of art under this chapter.

Of the funds transferred under subsection (a) of this section, $5,000.00 shall be available for use by the Council for the expenses of administering this chapter.

Funds may be transferred under this section without further approval or appropriation by the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 68, eff. June 21, 1994;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1), eff. May 6, 1996;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998;

2011, No. 104

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. May 7, 2012.

§ 44a.
Powers and duties of Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall:

Advise the Council on the administration of this chapter.

Approve up to two project sites per year for consideration under this chapter for the installation of artwork.

Establish procedures for accepting the donation to the State of artwork for installation in State buildings or facilities.

Establish procedures for communicating with artists interested in donating artwork to the State under the provisions of this chapter.

Review the final installation and placement of artwork.

Assist occupants and contracting agencies in locating liability insurance for artwork when necessary.

Ensure that early in the building design phase, the architect will discuss the placement and form of artwork with the selected artist, and that bid specifications will inform potential contractors of the artwork to be installed in the building or facility.

The Commissioner is authorized to purchase artwork for the permanent State House collection with funds appropriated to the Department for that or other purposes in any capital construction act.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998; amended

2001, No. 61

, § 30, eff. June 16, 2001;

2007, No. 52

, § 27, eff. May 28, 2007.

§ 45.
Duties of contracting agency.

Upon selection of an architect for any project, the contracting agency shall:

notify the architect of the provisions of this chapter;

notify the Commissioner and the Council of the selection of the architect and the details of the project; and

ensure that the architect discusses the form and placement of the artwork with the artist early in the planning and design phase of the building.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 69, eff. June 21, 1994;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998;

2007, No. 52

, § 28, eff. May 28, 2007.

§ 46.
Use of funds.

Project sites that are funded from an appropriation or appropriations in one or more annual capital construction acts, shall be eligible for consideration by the advisory committee for the installation of one or more permanent works of art. For a project expected to receive capital appropriations from more than one capital construction act, eligibility may be determined by the estimated total cost of the project after the initial appropriation is made. In recommending a project site to the advisory committee, the Commissioner shall give priority to buildings and facilities that are frequently visited by members of the public.

Priority in acquisitions and commissions of works of art shall be given to Vermont artists.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 70, eff. June 21, 1994;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998.

§ 47.
Advisory committee.

There is established an advisory committee to oversee the administration of the Art Acquisition Fund.

The advisory committee shall consist of the following or a designee: the Commissioner, the director of the Council, the Chairs of the House Committee on Corrections and Institutions and the Senate Committee on Institutions, and the Chair of the Vermont Board of Architects. Legislative members of the committee shall be entitled to per diem compensation and expense reimbursement for attending committee meetings pursuant to the provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 23

.

The committee shall:

oversee the administration of this chapter;

establish guidelines for the selection of works of art; and

establish guidelines for the composition of the art selection panel.

The selection of works of art to be installed under this chapter in facilities of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College and of the Vermont State Colleges shall be made pursuant to procedures of these institutions for this purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 71, eff. June 21, 1994;

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(c)(1), eff. May 6, 1996;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 285.

§ 48.
Powers and duties of Council.

The Council shall facilitate a process that will result in a recommendation of an artist or artist team for each project selected for installation of artwork. The artist or artist team shall collaborate with the project architect or design team during the initial design phase of the project.

Following design of the project, the Council shall:

Appoint persons to serve on the art selection panel.

Establish contract procedures for contracting with artists for works of art and with architects for services related to the planning for the acquisition of works of art.

On the advice of the art selection panel, arrange contracts with artists and order payments from the art acquisition fund for such works of art.

Review the final installation and placement of works of art. In the case of works to be commissioned, the art selection panel shall review the design, the final execution and the placement of the commissioned work.

Assist occupant and contracting agencies in locating insurance when it deems such insurance is necessary for the protection of the works of art that are purchased.

Without further appropriation, the Council may expend funds transferred to it for administration of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 72, eff. June 21, 1994;

1997, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 48, eff. April 29, 1998;

2007, No. 52

, § 29, eff. May 28, 2007.